Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 14A Kentucky Business Entity Filing Act
14A.3-010.
Entity name.

Except as authorized by subsection (24) of this section, the real name of an entity or foreign entity shall be distinguishable from any name of record with the Secretary of State.

The real name of a corporation or nonprofit corporation:

Shall end with the word “corporation,” “company,” or “limited” or the abbreviation “Corp.,” “Inc.,” “Co.,” or “Ltd.” or words or abbreviations of like import in another language, provided, however, that if a nonprofit corporation’s name includes the word “company” or the abbreviation “Co.,” it may not be immediately preceded by the word “and” or the abbreviation “&”;

If a professional service corporation, shall end with the words “professional service corporation” or the abbreviation “P.S.C.”; or

If a public benefit corporation, shall end with the words “public benefit corporation” or “benefit corporation” or the abbreviation “P.B.C.” or “PBC”; and

Shall not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by its organic act and its articles of incorporation.

The real name of a limited liability company shall end with the phrase “limited liability company” or “limited company” or the abbreviation “LLC” or “LC,” provided, however, if the company is a professional limited liability company the name shall end with the phrase “professional limited liability company” or “professional limited company” or the abbreviation “PLLC” or “PLC.” In the name of either a limited liability company or a professional limited liability company, the word “limited” may be abbreviated as “Ltd.” and the word “Company” may be abbreviated as “Co.”

The real name of a limited liability partnership registered pursuant to KRS

362.555

shall contain the phrase “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or the abbreviation “LLP” as the last words or letters of its name.

The real name of a partnership subject to KRS

362.1-101

to

362.1-975

, the “Kentucky Revised Uniform Partnership Act (2006)”:

Shall not contain the word “corporation” or “incorporated” or the abbreviation “Corp.” or “Inc.”; and

May contain the word “limited” or the abbreviation “Ltd.” only if the partnership has filed a statement of qualification.

The real name of a limited liability partnership that has filed a statement of qualification pursuant to KRS

362.1-931

shall end with the phrase “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or “Limited Liability Partnership” or the abbreviation “R.L.L.P.,” “L.L.P.,” “RLLP,” or “LLP.”

The real name of a limited partnership subject to KRS

362.401

to

362.525

, the “Kentucky Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act,” shall:

Contain the word “Limited” or the abbreviation “Ltd.” unless the limited partnership was formed under any statute of the Commonwealth prior to the adoption of the Kentucky Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act; and

Not contain the name of a limited partner unless:

That name is also the name of a general partner; or

The business of the limited partnership had been carried on under that name before the admission of that limited partner.

The real name of a limited partnership subject to KRS

362.2-102

to

362.2-977

, the “Kentucky Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2006),” that is not a limited liability limited partnership may contain the name of any partner and shall:

End with the phrase “limited partnership” or “limited” or the abbreviation “L.P.,” “LP,” or “Ltd.”; and

Not contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.L.P.” or “LLLP.”

The real name of a limited partnership subject to KRS

362.2-102

to

362.2-977

, the “Kentucky Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2006),” that is a limited liability limited partnership may contain the name of any partner and shall:

End with the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.L.P.” or “LLLP”; and

Not contain only the phrase “limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.P.” or “LP.”

Subject to KRS

362.2-974

, subsections (8) and (9) of this section shall not apply to a limited partnership formed under any statute of this Commonwealth prior to July 15, 1988.

The real name of a rural telephone cooperative corporation:

Shall contain the word “Telephone,” “Telecommunications,” “Company,” or “Corporation” and the abbreviation “Inc.,” unless in an affidavit made by its president or vice president, and filed with the Secretary of State, or in an affidavit made by a person signing articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger, or conversion which relate to that cooperative, and filed, together with any such articles, with the Secretary of State, it shall appear that the cooperative desires to do business in another state and is or would be precluded there from by reason of the inclusion of such words or either thereof in its name; and

May include the word “Cooperative.”

The phrase “Rural Electric Cooperative” may not be used in the name of any entity or foreign entity except for one formed under KRS Chapter 279.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the word “cooperative” may not be used in the name of any entity doing business in this Commonwealth.

The name of a limited cooperative association shall end with the words “limited cooperative association” or “limited cooperative” or the abbreviation “L.C.A.” or “LCA.” “Limited” may be abbreviated as “Ltd.,” “Cooperative” may be abbreviated as “Co-op” or “Coop,” and “Association” may be abbreviated as “Assoc.” or “Assn.”

There are no required identifiers for a business trust or a statutory trust, but the name of a business or statutory trust may include “Limited” or “Ltd.” and may not include any of “incorporated,” “corporation,” “Inc.,” “Corp.,” “partnership,” or “cooperative.”

The real name of an unincorporated nonprofit association that has filed a certificate of association with the Secretary of State shall end with “Limited” or “Ltd.,” and the real name of an unincorporated nonprofit association that has not filed a certificate of association with the Secretary of State shall not include “Limited” or “Ltd.” No unincorporated nonprofit association shall include in its name any of “incorporated,” “corporation,” “Inc.,” “Corp.,” “company,” “partnership,”“benefit,” or “cooperative.”

This chapter does not control the use of assumed names.

The filing of articles of incorporation, articles of organization, articles of association, a statement of qualification, a certificate of limited partnership, a declaration or certificate of trust, a certificate of association, an application to transact authority in the Commonwealth, a statement of foreign qualification, a name registration, or name reservation under a particular name shall not automatically prevent the use of that name or protect that name from use by other persons.

The provisions of subsection (2)(a) of this section shall not affect the right of any nonprofit corporation existing on June 13, 1968, to continue the use of its name as then in effect.

The assumption of a nonprofit corporate name in violation of this section shall not affect or vitiate the corporate existence, but the courts of this Commonwealth having equity jurisdiction may, upon the application of the Commonwealth or of any person interested or affected, enjoin such corporation from doing business under a name assumed in violation of this section, although a certificate of incorporation may have been issued.

This section shall not apply to any domestic or foreign telephone cooperative which became subject to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

by complying with the provisions of KRS

279.470

or which does business in this Commonwealth pursuant to KRS

279.570

and which elects to retain a name which does not comply with this section.

Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of a professional regulatory board to promulgate rules governing entities and foreign entities under its jurisdiction.

The real name of a foreign entity will be determined according to KRS

365.015

. For entities not covered by that statute, the real name of the foreign entity will be the real name of the entity as so recognized in the jurisdiction of its origination.

The real name of a partnership, other than that of a limited liability partnership as set forth on a statement of qualification or a registration as a limited liability partnership filed pursuant to KRS

362.555

or that of a foreign limited liability partnership as set forth on a statement of foreign qualification, need not be distinguishable from any name of record with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 23, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 29, § 6, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 82, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 160, § 126, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 106, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 34, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 28, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2011).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, sec. 23, in subsection (13), which deals with the business names of cooperative corporations and associations, contains a reference to
KRS

271.020

to

272.050

. It is apparent from context that this reference should be to
KRS

272.020

to

272.050

. This change has been made by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1).

14A.3-020.
Reserved name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a name, including a fictitious name for a foreign entity whose real name is not available, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application shall set forth the real name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the Secretary of State finds that the name applied for is distinguishable from any name of record with the Secretary of State, that name shall be reserved for the applicant’s exclusive use for a one hundred twenty (120) day period. During the thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of a reservation, the holder thereof may apply to renew the reservation on such form as shall be provided by the Secretary of State. The renewal shall be effective as of the expiration of the current reservation and shall renew the reservation for an additional one hundred twenty (120) days from the otherwise applicable expiration.

A reserved name shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

.

The applicant holding a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Secretary of State a signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

The holder of a reserved name may cancel the reservation by delivery to the Secretary of State of a notice of cancellation, executed by the applicant for whom the name is reserved, that states the reserved name and its initial date of reservation.

It shall not be necessary that a foreign entity desiring to reserve a name be qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 24, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.3-030.
Registered name.

A foreign entity may register its real name, or its real name with any addition required by KRS

14A.3-010

, if the name is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State.

A foreign entity shall register its real name, or its real name with any addition required by KRS

14A.3-010

, by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing an application setting forth:

Its real name, or its real name with any addition required by KRS

14A.3-010

;

The state or country of its organization;

Its form of organization;

Its principal office address; and

A brief description of the nature of the business in which it is engaged.

The name shall be registered for the applicant’s exclusive use upon the effective date of the application. A registration not renewed as provided in subsection (4) of this section shall expire on the next January 1.

A foreign entity whose registration is effective may renew it for successive years by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a renewal application, which complies with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, between October 1 and December 31 of the preceding year. The renewal application when filed shall renew the registration for the following calendar year.

A foreign entity whose registration is effective may thereafter qualify as a foreign entity under the registered name or consent in writing to the use of that name by an entity thereafter organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or by another foreign entity thereafter authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth. The registration shall terminate when the domestic entity is organized or the foreign entity qualifies or consents to the qualification of another foreign entity under the registered name.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 25, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.3-040.
Name of foreign entity.

If the real name of a foreign entity does not satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

as would apply were the foreign entity organized in this Commonwealth, the foreign entity seeking to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this Commonwealth:

May use a fictitious name to transact business in this Commonwealth if its real name is not distinguishable from any name of record with the Secretary of State; or

May supplement its name with such identifier as would be appropriate under KRS

14A.3-010

were the foreign entity organized in this Commonwealth.

The real or fictitious name of a foreign entity shall be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from any name of record with the Secretary of State.

If a foreign entity authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth changes its real name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

, it shall not transact business in this Commonwealth under the changed name until it adopts a fictitious name satisfying the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

and obtains an amended certificate of authority in accordance with KRS

14A.9-040

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 26, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 160, § 132, effective July 12, 2012.

14A.3-050.
Assumed name.

Each entity and each foreign business entity that has qualified to transact business, if transacting business under other than its real or a duly adopted fictitious name, shall comply with KRS

365.015

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 27, effective January 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER 4. Registered Office and Agent

14A.4-010.
Registered office and registered agent required.

Each entity and each foreign entity qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who may be:

An individual who resides in this Commonwealth and whose business address is identical with the registered office; or

An entity or foreign entity qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth whose business address is identical with the registered office.

Unless the registered agent signs the document making the appointment, the appointment of the registered agent or a successor registered agent on whom process may be given is not effective until the agent delivers a statement in writing to the Secretary of State accepting the appointment.

Each entity and each foreign entity maintaining a registered office and agent in this Commonwealth shall provide to its registered agent and update from time to time as necessary the name, business address, and business telephone number of a natural person who is authorized to receive communications from the registered agent. Such person shall be deemed the communications contact for the entity or foreign entity. Every registered agent shall retain in paper or electronic form the information concerning the current communications contact for each entity and each foreign entity for which that registered agent serves as registered agent. If the entity or foreign entity fails to provide the registered agent with a current communications contact, the registered agent may resign as the registered agent for such entity or foreign entity.

This section shall not apply to a domestic or foreign partnership that is not a limited liability partnership.

This section shall not apply to a limited partnership governed as to its internal affairs by the Kentucky Uniform Limited Partnership Act, KRS

362.410

to

362.700

.

This section shall not apply to a rural electric cooperative or to a foreign rural electric cooperative that is not required to qualify to transact business by means of a filing with the Secretary of State.

This section shall not apply to a rural telephone cooperative or to a foreign rural telephone cooperative that is not required to qualify to transact business by means of a filing with the Secretary of State.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 28, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2011). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, sec. 28(5) cites the Kentucky Uniform Limited Partnership Act, KRS

362.410

to

362.700

. These sections were repealed in 1988 Ky. Acts ch. 284, sec. 65.

14A.4-020.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

An entity or foreign entity may change its registered office or registered agent or both by delivering a statement of change to the Secretary of State for filing that sets forth:

The name of the entity or foreign entity;

The street address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent and the new agent’s written consent to the appointment; and

That after the change or changes are made, the street addresses of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes its business address, it shall change the street address of the registered office of any entity or foreign entity for which it is the registered agent by notifying the entity or foreign entity in writing of the change and signing and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and reciting that the entity or foreign entity has been notified of the change.

The change of address of the registered office or registered agent shall be effective upon filing by the Secretary of State. The appointment of a new registered agent shall be effective upon filing of the statement of change by the Secretary of State.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 29, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.4-030.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign the appointment by signing and delivering a statement of resignation to the Secretary of State for filing that may also provide that the registered office is discontinued.

After filing the statement, the Secretary of State shall mail one (1) copy to the registered office, if not discontinued, and the other copy to the entity or foreign entity at its principal office.

The agency appointment shall be terminated, and the registered office discontinued, if so provided, on the earlier of:

The appointment of a successor registered agent and, if applicable, registered office; or

The thirty-first day after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 30, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.4-040.
Service through registered agent.

An entity’s or foreign entity’s registered agent shall be its agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the entity or foreign entity.

If an entity or foreign entity has no registered agent, or the agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the entity or foreign entity may be served with process, or any notice or demand may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the entity or foreign entity at its principal office and to the attention of the person or office appropriate for giving notice to the entity or foreign entity. Service shall be perfected under this subsection at the earliest of:

The date the entity or foreign entity receives the mail;

The date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the entity or foreign entity; or

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed postage paid and correctly addressed.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving an entity or foreign entity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 31, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.4-050.
Obligations of registered agent.

The duties of a registered agent are to:

Forward to the entity or foreign entity for which it is the registered agent any service of process, notice, or demand received on its behalf; and

Collect and maintain the information described in KRS

14A.4-010

(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 32, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.4-060.
Venue for action against entity with registered office.

Excepting the actions provided in KRS

452.400

,

452.405

,

452.410

,

452.415

,

452.420

,

452.430

, 452,440,

452.445

,

452.465

, and

452.475

, an action against an entity or foreign entity that maintains a registered office may be brought in the county in which the office is situated.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 193, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER 5. Principal Office Address

14A.5-010.
Statement of change of principal office.

An entity required in its organizational filing to identify its principal office or a foreign entity qualified to transact business that changes the mailing address of its principal office shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing, on a form supplied by the Secretary of State, a statement of change that sets forth:

The name of the entity or foreign entity;

The address of its principal office prior to the change; and

The new principal office address.

Subsection (1) of this section shall apply to a statement of registration as a limited liability partnership filed pursuant to KRS

382.335

or statements filed pursuant to KRS Chapter 362.1.

Subsection (1) of this section shall apply to a change in the designated office of a limited partnership.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 33, effective January 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER 6. Annual Reports

14A.6-010.
Annual report.

Each entity and each foreign entity authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an annual report that sets forth:

The name of the entity or foreign entity and the state or country under whose law it is organized;

The address of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in this Commonwealth;

The address of its principal office; and

With respect to each:

Corporation, not-for-profit corporation, cooperative, association, or limited cooperative association, whether domestic or foreign:

The name and business address of the secretary or other officer with responsibility for authenticating the records of the entity;

The name and business address of each other principal officer; and

The name and business address of each director;

Manager-managed limited liability company, whether domestic or foreign, the name and business address of each manager;

Limited partnership, whether domestic or foreign, the name and business address of each general partner;

Business trust, whether domestic or foreign, the name and business address of each trustee;

Professional service corporation, domestic or foreign, a statement that each of the shareholders, not less than one-half (1/2) of the directors, and each of the officers other than secretary and treasurer is a qualified person; and

Unincorporated nonprofit association, the name and business address of each manager.

Information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the entity or foreign entity.

The first annual report shall be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and June 30 of the year following the calendar year in which an entity was organized or a foreign entity was authorized to transact business in this state. Subsequent annual reports shall be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and June 30 of each following calendar year.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify the entity or foreign entity in writing and return the report to it for correction, which notification may be accomplished electronically. For purposes of KRS

14A.2-130

or

14A.2-140

, an annual report returned for correction shall not be deemed to have been delivered until it is returned and accepted by the Secretary of State.

An entity or foreign entity may amend the information in its last filed annual report by delivery of an amendment to the annual report to the Secretary of State for filing on such form as is provided by the Secretary of State.

An unincorporated nonprofit association that has filed a certificate of association is subject to this section.

The requirement to file an annual report shall not apply to:

A limited partnership governed as to its internal affairs by the Kentucky Uniform Limited Partnership Act as it existed prior to its repeal by 1988 Ky. Acts ch. 284, sec. 65;

A partnership other than a limited liability partnership that has filed a statement of qualification pursuant to KRS

362.1-951

or a foreign limited liability partnership;

A foreign rural electric cooperative or foreign rural telephone cooperative not required to qualify to transact business by a filing with the Secretary of State; or

An unincorporated nonprofit association that has not filed a certificate of association.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 34, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 29, § 7, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 160, § 129, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 193, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER 7. Administrative Dissolution

14A.7-010.
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding to administratively dissolve an entity:

If the entity does not deliver for filing its annual report with the Secretary of State by the due date thereof;

If the entity is without a registered office or registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

If the entity does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days that its registered office or registered agent has been changed, that its registered office has been discontinued or that its registered agent has resigned; or

For such other reasons as are provided in this chapter or the organic law governing the entity.

Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not apply to any entity not obligated to file an annual report.

Subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section shall not apply to any entity that is not obligated to maintain a registered office and agent.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 35, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.7-020.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the Secretary of State determines that one (1) or more grounds exist for the administrative dissolution of an entity, the Secretary of State shall advise the entity of that determination.

If the entity does not within sixty (60) days from the date on which the notice was mailed, correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the entity by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and advise the entity of that determination.

An entity administratively dissolved continues its existence but shall not carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

The administrative dissolution of an entity shall not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 36, effective January 1, 2011.

14A.7-030.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

An entity administratively dissolved under KRS

14A.7-020

or predecessor law may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The application shall:

Recite the name of the entity and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

State that the entity’s name satisfies the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

;

Contain a certificate from the Department of Revenue reciting that all taxes owed by the entity have been paid;

Contain a representation that the entity has taken no steps to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs and notify claimants;

If a business corporation, contain a certificate from the Office of Unemployment Insurance reciting that all employer contributions, interest, penalties, and service capacity upgrade fund assessments have been paid; and

Be accompanied by the reinstatement penalty and the current fee for filing each delinquent annual report as provided for in this chapter.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application satisfies the requirement of subsection (1) of this section, he or she shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of existence that recites his or her determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and notify the entity of that filing, which notification may be accomplished electronically.

When the reinstatement is effective:

It shall relate back to and take effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution:

The entity shall continue carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution or revocation had never occurred; and

The liability of any agent shall be determined as if the administrative dissolution or revocation had never occurred.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, any entity which was administratively dissolved and has taken the action necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs and notify claimants shall be prohibited from reinstatement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 37, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 83, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 146, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 236, § 14, effective July 1, 2022.

14A.7-040.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies an entity’s application for reinstatement the Secretary of State shall notify the entity and provide the reason or reasons for denial, which notification may be accomplished electronically.

The entity may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Franklin Circuit Court. The entity may appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of dissolution, the entity’s application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved entity or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 38, effective January 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER 8. End of Duration

14A.8-010.
End of duration.

An entity, upon the expiration of its period of duration as set forth in its organic filing, may in the sixty (60) day period thereafter amend its organic filing to extend its period of duration or to delete its period of duration, which amendment shall relate back to the day immediately preceding the expiration of the period of duration.

An entity that fails to so amend its organic filing in that sixty (60) day period may not thereafter be reinstated, and shall liquidate its business and affairs in accordance with its organic act.

The Secretary of State may with respect to an entity whose period of duration has expired issue a certificate of dissolution or document of similar import notwithstanding that such certificate is issued within the sixty (60) day period referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

This section shall have no bearing on whether or not the owners and representatives of an entity, after expiration of its period of duration, have limited liability from the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 39, effective January 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER 9. Foreign Business Entities

14A.9-010.
Authority to transact business required — Certificate of authority required for award of state contract — Exception for foreign insurer.

A foreign entity shall not transact business in this Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

The following activities, among others, shall not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors, shareholders, partners, members, managers, beneficial owners, or trustees or carrying on other activities concerning the internal affairs of the foreign entity;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign entity’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees, agents, or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real, personal, or intangible property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and that is not one (1) in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature; and

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

The list of activities in subsection (2) of this section is not exhaustive.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, this section shall not apply to foreign general partnerships. Whether a foreign limited liability partnership is transacting business in this Commonwealth shall be determined under subsection (2) of this section. A foreign limited liability partnership that is transacting business in this Commonwealth shall file a statement of foreign qualification pursuant to KRS

362.1-951

.

This section shall not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign entity to service of process or taxation in this Commonwealth or to regulation under any other law of this Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a foreign entity, in order to be eligible for award of a state contract under KRS Chapter 45A or 176, shall have a certificate of authority or a statement of foreign qualification.

A foreign insurer with a certificate of authority from the commissioner of the Department of Insurance is not subject to subsection (1) or (6) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 40, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 80, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 84, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 5, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2011). The word “contracts” in subsection (5) of this statute has been changed in codification to “contacts.” This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

14A.9-020.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign entity transacting business in this Commonwealth without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding in any court in this Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of authority.

Neither the successor to a foreign entity that transacted business in this Commonwealth without a certificate of authority nor the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business shall maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in this Commonwealth until the foreign entity or the assignee of the cause of action obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign entity, its successor, or assignee until it determines whether the foreign entity, its successor, or assignee requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court may further stay the proceeding until the foreign entity, its successor, or assignee obtains the certificate.

A foreign entity is liable for a civil penalty of two dollars ($2) for each day it transacts business in this Commonwealth without a certificate of authority. The Secretary of State may collect all penalties due under this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the failure of a foreign entity to obtain a certificate of authority shall not impair the validity of the acts of the foreign entity or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 41, effective January 1, 2011.